Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-1,101
Violations; penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of the Weights and Measures Act or any order of the department after such order has become final or upon termination of any review proceeding, when the order has been sustained by a court of law, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Upon a subsequent conviction thereof, he or she shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1972, LB 1413, § 19;

Laws 1974, LB 17, § 3;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 338;

Laws 1987, LB 201, § 6;

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 31.